Utah statutes.
39-6-89.   Signing a false record.

A person subject to this chapter who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

